South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5506.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 55-11-620 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 55-11-620. The corporate powers and duties of the Pee Dee Regional Airport District must be exercised and performed by an authority to be known as the Pee Dee Regional Airport Authority which consists of nine members. Two members must be residents of the City of Florence appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Florence City CouncilCounty Legislative Delegation. Three members must be residents of the County of Florence appointed by the Governor on the recommendation of the Florence County CouncilLegislative Delegation. Two members must be residents of each of the counties of Marion and Dillon appointed by the Governor on the recommendation of the respective county councilslegislative delegations. Terms of office are for four years, except that of those initially appointed one member from each of the three counties must be appointed for two-year terms. No member shall serve more than two four-year terms. All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Vacancies on the authority must be filled in the manner of their original appointment for the unexpired term. The authority shall elect its own officers with terms and duties as determined by the authority. The members of the authority must be compensated at the per diem rate of fifty dollars a meeting, not to exceed twelve meetings a year until such time as the amount is increased by the councils of the counties. SECTION 2.  Section 55-11-630 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (14) maintain a perpetual exemption from the imposition or assessment of any stormwater fee, charge, assessment, or similar exaction, whether characterized as a fee or a tax, relating to stormwater runoff, imposed at any time by any state, county, or municipal governmental entity, or by any private contractor or third party acting on behalf of, or under authority of, such governmental entities. SECTION 3.  Section 55-11-640(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) All fines and forfeitures collected under the provisions of this article must be forwarded to the authority to be credited to the general operating fund of the county where the final disposition of the case is made All fines and forfeitures collected pursuant to the provisions of this section must be forwarded weekly to the Pee Dee Regional Airport District by the enforcing court for deposit in the general operating fund of the district. SECTION 4.  Chapter 11, Title 55 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 55-11-740. (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, the Pee Dee Regional Airport District may make application to the Foreign-Trade Zones Board for the purpose of establishing, operating, and maintaining foreign-trade zones in Chesterfield, Darlington, Dillon, Florence, Horry, Marion, and Marlboro counties, under the act of Congress known as the Foreign-Trade Zones Act, which provides for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign-trade zones in the United States. (B) The Pee Dee Regional Airport District shall select and describe the location of the zones for which application may be made and shall make such regulations concerning the operation, maintenance, and policing of them as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the Foreign-Trade Zones Act and for other appropriate purposes. (C) The Pee Dee Regional Airport District has the authority to own, erect, maintain, and operate or lease any structures or buildings or enclosures as may be necessary or proper for establishing, operating, and maintaining such foreign-trade zones within Chesterfield, Darlington, Dillon, Florence, Horry, Marion, and Marlboro counties. (D) The authority granted to the Pee Dee Regional Airport District confers the right, duty, and power to do all things necessary and proper to achieve compliance with the Foreign-Trade Zones Act and to carry into effect the establishing, operating, and maintaining of foreign-trade zones within Chesterfield, Darlington, Dillon, Florence, Horry, Marion, and Marlboro counties. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----